Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201476-3218
Rules and regulations.

The board
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations not inconsistent with the Nebraska
Appraisal Management Company Registration Act which may be reasonably necessary
to implement, administer, and enforce the provisions of the act.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 18.